North Dakota, session 69, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Family days - Holidays - Extracurricular activities prohibited.
A school may not hold an extracurricular activity, including a practice, game, performance,
competition, meeting, or event, whether required or optional, on a family day. For purposes of
this section, a "family day" means New Year's Day, Memorial Day, the anniversary of the
Declaration of Independence, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day, as those terms are
defined under section 1 - 03 - 01, and Easter Sunday .
Page No. 1 25.0708.01000